Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-546
Sections; applicability to policies on employee use of nonowned vehicles.

Sections 60-501 to 60-569 shall not be held to apply to or affect policies solely insuring the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance or use, by persons in the employ of the insured or on his behalf, of motor vehicles not owned by the insured.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 46, p. 498.